District of Columbia statutes.
22-3218.02

Unlawful acts.

Unless a person shall be authorized, or employed by, a company engaged in the generation or distribution of natural gas or electricity, a person shall not willfully connect or disconnect an electrical conductor belonging to the company; make any connection with an electrical conductor for the purpose of using or wasting the electric current or gas; tamper with a meter used to register gas or current consumed; interfere with the operation of an electrical or gas appliance of the company; or tamper, or interfere, with the poles, wires, or conduits used by the company. Nothing in this section shall prevent the lawful governmental regulation of gas or electric companies or electricity suppliers, or their conductors, appliances, machinery, and poles.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 118a
as added June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 15, 50 DCR 1092

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3218.03 and § 22-3218.04.